test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kiela_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


# â stems



  Noun - kielâ: # â-stems
    kielâ+N+Sg+Nom: kieḷâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Gen: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Acc: kielâ
    kielâ+N+Sg+Ill: kieḷân
    kielâ+N+Sg+Loc: kielâst
    kielâ+N+Sg+Com: kieláin
    kielâ+N+Sg+Abe: kieˊlâttáá
    kielâ+N+Ess: kiellân
    kielâ+N+Par: kiellâd
    kielâ+N+Pl+Nom: kielah
    kielâ+N+Pl+Gen: kielâi, kieˊlâi
    kielâ+N+Pl+Acc: kielâid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Ill: kieláid
    kielâ+N+Pl+Loc: kielâin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Com: kieˊlâiguin
    kielâ+N+Pl+Abe: kieˊlâittáá
